Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.90.100

Electronic data theft.

(1) A person is guilty of electronic data theft if he or she intentionally, without authorization, and without reasonable grounds to believe that he or she has such authorization, obtains any electronic data with the intent to:

(a) Devise or execute any scheme to defraud, deceive, extort, or commit any other crime in violation of a state law not included in this chapter; or

(b) Wrongfully control, gain access to, or obtain money, property, or electronic data.

(2) Electronic data theft is a class C felony.

[ 2016 c 164 s 10.]